Louisiana, session 2026, SB405.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2009.10.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2009.10.2. Statewide quality oversight for nursing facilities; state
requirements
A. The Louisiana Department of Health shall develop a statewide quality
oversight initiative for nursing facilities.
(1) The short-term goal of the initiative shall be to stabilize performance
of facilities by identifying gaps, deploying targeted incentives, aligning
interventions with the most pressing quality risks, and identifying funding for
execution of the initiative.
(2) The long-term goal shall be to create a more robust statewide quality
oversight system capable of supporting and driving continuous improvement
and overall system level changes.
(3) Stakeholders, including trade and advocacy associations, individuals
engaged in the daily operational practice of nursing facility care, and quality
improvement organizations, shall be identified and utilized by the department
to build a coordinated approach centered on collaboration, education, and
practical tools.
B. The Louisiana Department of Health, through the office of aging and
adult services, shall identify and develop internal subject-matter experts to
support the statewide quality oversight initiative. The department may utilize
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 405 ENROLLED
such efforts as considered appropriate, including but not limited to:
(1) Data dashboards and public-facing online tools.
(2) Resident and family satisfaction surveys.
(3) Staff training plans and ongoing staff training and development.
(4) Participation in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
Nursing Home Staffing Campaign.
C. The department shall submit an initial report to the Senate and House
committees on health and welfare on the status of the statewide quality
oversight initiative on January 1, 2028, and annually on the first of January
thereafter.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.